Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.138

Collection of overpayments—Waiver of overpayment.

(1) The director may waive repayment of all or part of a retirement allowance overpayment, under RCW 41.50.130 only, if:

(a) The overpayment was not the result of the retiree's or the beneficiary's nondisclosure, fraud, misrepresentation, or other fault; and

(b) The director finds in his or her sole discretion that recovery of the overpayment would be a manifest injustice.

(2) The director may not waive an overpayment if the member, retiree, or beneficiary:

(a) Provided incorrect information to the department or the employer which caused the overpayment;

(b) Failed to provide information to the department or the employer which was necessary to correctly calculate the retirement allowance;

(c) Caused the employer to provide incorrect information or fail to provide necessary information; or

(d) Knew or reasonably should have known that he or she was in receipt of an overpayment.

(3) If the director waives an overpayment and the overpayment occurred because the member's or retiree's employer:

(a) Provided incorrect information to the department which caused the overpayment;

(b) Failed to provide information to the department which was necessary to correctly calculate the retirement allowance;

(c) Caused another party to provide incorrect information or fail to provide necessary information; or

(d) Knew or reasonably should have known that the information provided would cause the retiree or beneficiary to be overpaid;

then the department shall bill the member's or retiree's employer for the amount of the overpayment that would have been recoverable under RCW 41.50.130 had the overpayment not been waived pursuant to this section.

(4) Nothing in this section authorizes the director to waive the prospective correction of an overstated retirement allowance.

(5) If the director waives an overpayment he or she must state in writing:

(a) The nature of and reason for the overpayment;

(b) The reason for the waiver; and

(c) The amount of the overpayment that is waived.

The department will maintain a file containing documentation of all overpayments waived. The department will provide the file to any person upon request.

(6) This section applies to overpayments identified on or after September 1, 1994.

[ 1996 c 56 s 4.]